tables/hu-hu-g2_exceptions.cti
#Words, with only end of suffix need abbreviate, and need different marking braille with previous defined in hu-exceptionwords.cti file
always akáccal 1-13-4-14-1236
always lánccal 123-4-1345-14-1236
always tánccal 2345-4-1345-14-1236
always habarccsal 125-1-12-1-1235-146-1236
always országgal 135-1245-1236
always barlanggal 12-1-1235-123-1-1345-1245-1236
always betegséggel 12-15-2345-15-234-16-1245-1236
always dömpinggel 145-12345-134-24-1345-1245-1236
always marketinggel 134-1-1235-13-15-2345-24-1345-1245-1236
always sereggel 234-15-1235-15-1245-1236
always üveggel 12356-1236-15-1245-1236
always sebességgel 234-15-12-15-234-234-16-1245-1236
always rendszerben 1235-15-1345-145-156-15-1235-12
endword lemezzel 123-15-134-15-126-1236
word lemezzel 123-15-134-15-126-1236
always pénzzel 1234-126-1236
always réteggel 1235-16-2345-15-1245-1236
always rézzel 1235-16-126-1236
always vízzel 1236-34-126-1236
always tűzzel 2345-23456-126-1236
endword vízzel 1236-34-126-1236
always kézzel 13-16-126-1236
always áramlással 4-1235-1-134-123-4-234-1236
always csalással 146-1-123-4-234-1236
always típussal 2345-34-1234-136-234-1236
always várossal 1236-4-1235-135-234-1236
always bírsággal 12-34-1235-234-4-1245-1236
always világgal 1236-1245-1236
always virággal 1236-24-1235-4-1245-1236
always működéssel 134-23456-13-12345-145-16-234-1236
always halmazzal 125-1-123-134-1-126-1236
always aktivitással 1-13-2345-24-1236-24-2345-4-234-1236
always alvással 1-123-1236-4-234-1236
always állomással 4-123-123-135-134-4-234-1236
always ápolással 4-1234-135-123-4-234-1236
always árréssel 4-1235-1235-16-234-1236
always árveréssel 4-1235-1236-15-1235-16-234-1236
always áttöréssel 4-2345-12345-1235-16-234-1236
always bukással 12-136-13-4-234-1236
always ciklussal 14-24-13-123-136-234-1236
always dolgozással 145-135-123-1245-135-126-4-234-1236
always effektussal 15-124-124-15-13-2345-136-234-1236
always egyenessel 15-1456-15-1345-15-234-1236
always énekessel 16-1345-15-13-15-234-1236
always ellátással 15-123-123-4-2345-4-234-1236
always emelkedéssel 15-134-15-123-13-15-145-16-234-1236
always erősítéssel 15-1235-12456-234-34-2345-16-234-1236
always hirdetéssel 125-24-1235-145-15-2345-16-234-1236
always intrikussal 24-1345-2345-1235-24-13-136-234-1236
always járással 245-4-1235-4-234-1236
always kezdéssel 13-15-126-145-16-234-1236
always képzéssel 13-16-1234-126-16-234-1236
always kiadással 13-24-1-145-4-234-1236
always kutatással 13-136-2345-1-2345-4-234-1236
always kórussal 13-246-1235-136-234-1236
always látással 123-4-2345-4-234-1236
always légzéssel 123-16-1245-126-16-234-1236
always lépéssel 123-16-1234-16-234-1236
always munkással 134-136-1345-13-4-234-1236
always oktatással 135-13-2345-1-2345-4-234-1236
always orvossal 135-1235-1236-135-234-1236
always óriással 246-1235-24-4-234-1236
always réssel 1235-16-234-1236
always ritmussal 1235-24-2345-134-136-234-1236
always rovással 1235-135-1236-4-234-1236
always településsel 2345-15-123-15-1234-12356-123-16-234-1236
always tojással 2345-135-245-4-234-1236
always töréssel 2345-12345-1235-16-234-1236
always utasítással 136-2345-1-234-34-2345-4-234-1236
always ütéssel 12356-2345-16-234-1236
always vallással 1236-1-123-123-4-234-1236
always viselkedéssel 1236-24-234-15-123-13-15-145-16-234-1236
always elemzéssel 15-123-15-134-126-16-234-1236
always kérdéssel 13-16-1235-145-16-234-1236
always biznisszel 12-24-126-1345-24-156-1236
always százzal 156-4-126-1236
always vázzal 1236-4-126-1236
always házzal 125-4-126-1236
always bűnözéssel 12-345-1345-12345-126-16-234-1236
always ejtőernyőssel 15-245-2345-12456-15-1235-1246-12456-234-1236
always feltevéssel 124-15-123-2345-15-1236-16-234-1236
always említéssel 15-134-123-34-2345-16-234-1236
always ötvössel 12345-2345-1236-12345-234-1236
always erőlködéssel 15-1235-12456-123-13-12345-145-16-234-1236
always érveléssel 16-1235-1236-15-123-16-234-1236
always vörössel 1236-12345-1235-12345-234-1236
always felszereléssel 124-15-123-156-15-1235-15-123-16-234-1236
always hitelesítéssel 125-24-2345-15-123-15-234-34-2345-16-234-1236
always meggyessel 134-15-1456-1456-15-234-1236
always sertéssel 234-15-1235-2345-16-234-1236
always incidenssel 24-1345-14-24-145-15-1345-234-1236
always kontinenssel 13-135-1345-2345-24-1345-15-1345-234-1236
always művelődéssel 134-23456-1236-15-123-12456-145-16-234-1236
always lebegéssel 123-15-12-15-1245-16-234-1236
always mágnessel 134-4-1245-1345-15-234-1236
always meglepetéssel 134-15-1245-123-15-1234-15-2345-16-234-1236
always mesterségessel 134-15-234-2345-15-1235-234-16-1245-15-234-1236
always pilissel 1234-24-123-24-234-1236
always sikeressel 234-24-13-15-1235-15-234-1236
always szekeressel 156-15-13-15-1235-15-234-1236
always tetszéssel 2345-15-2345-156-16-234-1236
always ciripeléssel 14-24-1235-24-1234-15-123-16-234-1236
always örökséggel 12345-1235-12345-13-234-16-1245-1236
always zománccal 126-135-134-4-1345-14-1236
always piaccal 1234-24-1-14-1236
always árboccal 4-1235-12-135-14-1236
always árbóccal 4-1235-12-246-14-1236
always tanonccal 2345-1-1345-135-1345-14-1236
always matraccal 134-1-2345-1235-1-14-1236
always bohóccal 12-135-125-246-14-1236
always daróccal 145-1-1235-246-14-1236
always lazaccal 123-1-126-1-14-1236
always harminccal 125-1-1235-134-24-1345-14-1236
always párduccal 1234-4-1235-145-136-14-1236
always ifjonccal 24-124-245-135-1345-14-1236
always polccal 1234-135-123-14-1236
always kudarccal 13-136-145-1-1235-14-1236
always kuruccal 13-136-1235-136-14-1236
always malaccal 134-1-123-1-14-1236
always martalóccal 134-1-1235-2345-1-123-246-14-1236
always nyolccal 1246-135-123-14-1236
always palóccal 1234-1-123-246-14-1236
always pokróccal 1234-135-13-1235-246-14-1236
always ribanccal 1235-24-12-1-1345-14-1236
always suhanccal 234-136-125-1-1345-14-1236
always tornáccal 2345-135-1235-1345-4-14-1236
always udvaronccal 136-145-1236-1-1235-135-1345-14-1236
always újonccal 346-245-135-1345-14-1236
always fegyenccel 124-15-1456-15-1345-14-1236
always fejléccel 124-15-245-123-16-14-1236
always filccel 124-24-123-14-1236
always gerinccel 1245-15-1235-24-1345-14-1236
always kilenccel 13-24-123-15-1345-14-1236
always pereccel 1234-15-1235-15-14-1236
always ketreccel 13-15-2345-1235-15-14-1236
always licenccel 123-24-14-15-1345-14-1236
always ujjperccel 136-245-245-1234-15-1235-14-1236
always barccsal 12-1-1235-146-1236
always kaviccsal 13-1-1236-24-146-1236
always kapolccsal 13-1-1234-135-123-146-1236
always táncsiccsal 2345-4-1345-146-24-146-1236
always vakarccsal 1236-1-13-1-1235-146-1236
word azonnal 1-126-135-1345-1345-1-123
endword darabban 145-1-1235-1-12-12
word darabban 145-1-1235-1-12-12
word küszöbben 13-12356-156-12345-12-12
endword küszöbben 13-12356-156-12345-12-12
endword klubban 13-123-136-12-12
word klubban 13-123-136-12-12
endword clubban 14-123-136-12-12
word clubban 14-123-136-12-12
word lábban 123-4-12-12
endword lábban 123-4-12-12
always ugyanabban 136-1456-1-1345-1-12-12
always ugyanebben 136-1456-1-1345-15-12-12
word aként =
always ellenállással 15-123-123-15-1345-4-123-123-4-234-1236
always rajzzal 1235-1-245-126-1236
always gazsággal 1245-1-126-234-4-1245-1236
always alkotással 1-123-13-135-2345-4-234-1236
always pátosszal 1234-4-2345-135-156-1236
always antikvitással 1-1345-2345-24-13-1236-24-2345-4-234-1236
always protonnal 1234-1235-135-2345-135-1345-1236
always farkassal 124-1-1235-13-1-234-1236
always gyilkossággal 1456-24-123-13-135-234-234-4-1245-1236
always árulással 4-1235-136-123-4-234-1236
always robbanással 1235-135-12-12-1-1345-4-234-1236
always utalással 136-2345-1-123-4-234-1236
always vívással 1236-34-1236-4-234-1236
always mutatkozással 134-136-2345-1-2345-13-135-126-4-234-1236
always lakással 123-1-13-4-234-1236
always fordítással 124-135-1235-145-34-2345-4-234-1236
always terrorizmussal 2345-15-1235-1235-135-1235-24-126-134-136-234-1236
always kontaktussal 13-135-1345-2345-1-13-2345-136-234-1236
always carlitosszal 14-1-1235-123-24-2345-135-156-1236
always ciprussal 14-24-1234-1235-136-234-1236
always periódussal 1234-15-1235-24-246-145-136-234-1236
always csősszel 146-12456-156-1236
always mászással 134-4-156-4-234-1236
always diakónussal 145-24-1-13-246-1345-136-234-1236
always dialógussal 145-24-1-123-246-1245-136-234-1236
always dinoszaurusszal 145-24-1345-135-156-1-136-1235-136-156-1236
always pólussal 1234-246-123-136-234-1236
always dobolással 145-135-12-135-123-4-234-1236
always dragonyossal 145-1235-1-1245-135-1246-135-234-1236
always pedagógussal 1234-15-145-1-1245-246-1245-136-234-1236
always mítosszal 134-34-2345-135-156-1236
always migránssal 134-24-1245-1235-4-1345-234-1236
always epidermisszel 15-1234-24-145-15-1235-134-24-156-1236
always epilógussal 15-1234-24-123-246-1245-136-234-1236
always prológussal 1234-1235-135-123-246-1245-136-234-1236
always eposszal 15-1234-135-156-1236
always erőforrással 15-1235-12456-1235-1235-4-234-1236
always politikussal 1234-135-123-24-2345-24-13-136-234-1236
always felsorolással 124-15-123-234-135-1235-135-123-4-234-1236
always fuvarossal 124-136-1236-1-1235-135-234-1236
always identitással 24-145-15-1345-234-24-2345-4-234-1236
always puskással 1234-136-234-13-4-234-1236
always gránátossal 1245-1235-4-1345-4-2345-135-234-1236
always gyalogossal 1456-1-123-135-1245-135-234-1236
always zaklatással 126-1-13-123-1-2345-4-234-1236
always hallással 125-1-123-123-4-234-1236
always démokritosszal 145-16-134-135-13-1235-24-2345-135-156-1236
always héphaisztosszal 125-16-1234-125-1-24-156-2345-135-156-1236
always hérakleitosszal 125-16-1235-1-13-123-15-24-2345-135-156-1236
always hérodotosszal 125-16-1235-135-145-135-2345-135-156-1236
always milétosszal 134-24-123-16-2345-135-156-1236
always taigetosszal 2345-1-24-1245-15-2345-135-156-1236
always horkolással 125-135-1235-13-135-123-4-234-1236
always hússzelettel 125-346-234-156-15-123-15-2345-1236
always ikarosszal 24-13-1-1235-135-156-1236
always szurkolással 156-136-1235-13-135-123-4-234-1236
always kerékpárossal 13-15-1235-16-13-1234-4-1235-135-234-1236
always koldussal 13-135-123-145-136-234-1236
always konfliktussal 13-135-1345-124-123-24-13-2345-136-234-1236
always konstanssal 13-135-1345-234-2345-1-1345-234-1236
always kortárssal 13-135-1235-2345-4-1235-234-1236
always tetoválással 2345-15-2345-135-1236-4-123-4-234-1236
always kreativitással 13-1235-15-1-2345-24-1236-24-2345-4-234-1236
always likviditással 123-24-13-1236-24-145-24-2345-4-234-1236
always páncélossal 1234-4-1345-14-16-123-135-234-1236
always magatartással 13-1-1245-1-2345-1-1235-2345-4-234-1236
always megtorlással 134-15-1245-2345-135-1235-123-4-234-1236
always piramissal 1234-24-1235-1-134-24-234-1236
always mikulással 134-24-13-136-123-4-234-1236
always mitugrásszal 134-24-2345-136-1245-1235-4-156-1236
always nyilassal 1246-24-123-1-234-1236
always nyílással 1246-34-123-4-234-1236
always ozirisszel 135-126-24-1235-24-156-1236
always padlással 1234-1-145-123-4-234-1236
always pénisszel 1234-16-1345-24-156-1236
always pirossal 1234-24-1235-135-234-1236
always puffanással 1234-136-124-124-1-1345-4-234-1236
always realitással 1235-15-1-123-24-2345-4-234-1236
always tapssal 2345-1-1234-234-1236
always toposszal 2345-135-1234-135-156-1236
always vassal 1236-1-234-1236
always verbunkossal 1236-15-1235-12-136-1345-13-135-234-1236
always vonóssal 1236-135-1345-246-234-1236
always telefonnal 2345-15-123-15-124-135-1345-1236
always átlaggal 4-2345-123-1-1245-1236
always óceánnal 246-14-15-4-1345-1236
always mérleggel 134-16-1235-123-15-1245-1236
always bádoggal 12-4-145-135-1245-1236
always balatonnal 12-1-123-1-2345-135-1345-1236
always horoggal 125-135-1235-135-1245-1236
always baromsággal 12-1-1235-135-134-234-4-1245-1236
always tehetséggel 2345-15-125-15-2345-234-16-1245-1236
always tamponnal 2345-1-134-1234-135-1345-1236
always maratonnal 134-1-1235-1-2345-135-1345-1236
always börtönnel 12-12345-1235-2345-12345-1345-1236
always bronzzal 12-1235-135-1345-126-1236
always újsággal 346-245-2345-4-1245-1236
always bumeránggal 12-136-134-15-1235-4-1345-1245-1236
